 
 
Eva's Wine Cellar
 
 
Are you looking for a nice, cozy place to unwind after a hard day toiling on the Politics or Relationships forums?

Just want a peaceful place full of friendly faces and lighthearted conversation?

You've come to the right place.

 

Pull up a chair and pour yourself a glass! There's always a fire glowing in the grate here at Eva's. Find yourself a nice, dark corner for a private conversation, or join the group at one of the large tables if you're hungry. There's plenty of food on the buffet...just help yourself.

No arguments allowed here. Just good times.

Oh, and I'm just the hostess. We have a sommelier, Jacques, who knows all about the wines...just ask him. My specialty is conversation.
 
 
I would like a "Château Lafitte" 1978!
 
 
Looks like I'm just in time. I'd like what Francis is having. Is that your puppy in your avatar Francis?
 
 
Yes it is Montana, but it has grown a little!
 
 
Jacques...would you, please?

So, Francis, what are you up to these days? I see you're from Paris. I was there a couple of years ago. The French people were wonderful to me.
 
 
Montana! So good to see you! I saved you a seat by the fire...if you're not already overheated! (heehee)  
 
 
Francis
Your puppy is so cute :-D

Eva
Thanks for having me and saving my favorite seat by the fire. You know how hard it is for me to keep warm at this time of the year. Mom says I'm cold blooded, but I always say "atleast I have a warm heart" ;-)
How is everything in your neck of the woods, Eva?
 
 
As usual, I'm always on trivia! You know why? Life is tough, harassing.

Here is a relaxing place.

People mainly reacts to kindness with kindness.
At least, I react this way.

While in Paris, what have you liked most?
 
 
Ah, you certainly do have a warm heart, Montana! But I thought that saying was about cold feet? Oh well, "cold feet" doesn't describe you anyway. I've always thought of you as someone who jumps headlong into things. Like myself.

Me? I've been busy opening up this place. It's been closed for years. Lots of dust, but <looking around> I think it has possibilities.
 
 
Why thank you Eva. You're very kind. I like the place just the way it is. I love the way the lights are dimmed enough to make it warm and welcoming.
 
 
Wow Eva, this is a nice place. I'd like to sit at Montana's table...I want to treat her to a birthday drink...now where is Jacques? Is he the hunky guy over there that looks like Jude Law?
 
 
I agree, Francis. I come here mainly for entertainment, too. And kindness? Kindness will always be welcome at Eva's.

I fell in love with Sainte Chappelle when I was in Paris. Spent most of a day there, taking photos. Was surprised to find Notre Dame smaller than I had always imagined. I made it a goal to get lost in Paris. I succeeded. <smiling> Loved buying wine in the grocery stores there, too. Here's a nice bottle I picked up for 2 Euros...it would cost $20 here in America. What do you think of it?
 
 
Hey there colorbook. I agree that this place is awesome and I have a feeling we will be regulars in here. Thanks for the drink. I really shouldn't be drinking again since I had so much wine last night, but what the hell, it's the weekend and I couldn't miss Eva's opening night.

Cheers :-D
 
 
wander in Paris is a nice activity.

Dimension of Notre Dame depends on you are american or european (europeans find it big).

As you can have a bottle for 2€ (try alt+e), you cant expect it would be a very good wine.
It's probably a good wine.

Guess the cost of a Chateau Lafitte. I was joking when I asked for it!
 
 
 
...now where is Jacques? Is he the hunky guy over there that looks like Jude Law?
 

Perhaps a slightly older Jude with a mustache, I think. But Jude is certainly welcome if he ever decides to drop in.

Would you stand over there, Jacques, while I take your picture for colorbook? Yes, just hold up that bottle of wine. That's it. Perfect.

 
 
 
Francis, if you want Chateau Lafitte, you get Chateau Lafitte!!! I can afford virtually anything here!  

We have different keyboards though, I'm afraid. When I type Alt+e, I get "Edit."

Oh my! You people have already eaten all the baguettes! I must run over to the baker's and get a few dozen more! I'll be back in a while...carry on.
 
 
try alt gr+e
 
 
You're welcome Montana  

Eva, these are gorgeous wine goblets…you have a fine eye for quality.

 
 
 
Same thing, I'm afraid. Probably the difference between American and European keyboards.

Funny thing...I was expecting Notre Dame to be larger after all the Italian churches I've seen. Yes, that was probably it.

Colorbook, feel free to flirt with Jacques if you don't think he's too old for you. He can be quite the charmer, that one!

Back in a bit...
 
 
Yes, indeed. Eva has a lot of class, doesn't she :-D

Eva
That Jacques is a keeper for sure :-D
 
 
Jacques brought me the Chateau Lafitte!

 
 
 
Oh how nice, a wine bar - just what I need now.
I have the house full of wanna be teenagers putting on
a style show with little CJane's clothes, and her
entire closet looks like a bomb went in.

I need something soothing, comforting and numbing quick<sigh>

Could I try a heavy Bordeaux that knocks
my socks off?
 
 
Hey, Calamity, over here. You're welcome to come and sit with us.
 
 
I guess I had to help myself to the wine cellar  

Oh, now I see you. Hi Montana!
I'll be right there.....
 
 
Jacques might not have seen you come in because he was busy polishing the bottles, so maybe we should put just a little bell at the door, so Jacques will know when someone comes in.
 
 
Indeed that would be a good idea Montana.

Oh Charle...aehm Jacques,  
could I have a refill please.

All the girls are shouting now in my daughters room,
since the music is around 90 decible.

My nerves!! Jacques, maybe you'll leave the bottle here....
 
 
What a lovely place, with people who are warm and welcoming. Eva, you do know how to make the ambience restful yet interesting. I don't think I've ever seen a wine cellar this large--actually, I've never seen a wine cellar!

Francis, we are so looking forward to meeting you in London. Do me a favor when we meet for dinner--choose the wine. I love fairly light wines, red or white, but I have no sophistication when it comes to labels or types of wine.

Montana, sweet Montana, I have heard a little about your day and thoroughly sympathize and agree with you!! Here's a toast to Montana-- a woman of character and quality.

Clamity Jane, your post had me laughing at the thought of all those teenage girls. Is it possible to be heard above all that noise? I had two sons, but I've been to female houses and they are rowdy and raucous. I think they are actually louder than boys. I'll order another bottle from Jacques. What is your favorite?
 
 
Diane, at this point I drink anything.
Actually the girls are only 9 years old but going on 16 <sigh>
Luckily, the last pre-teen has left just 15 minutes ago
and my own rascal is in the bathtub, so I just enjoy the utter quietness right now.

Let's have a good californian Merlot Diane. Have you ever
tried Francis Coppola's wines? He's not only a good movie
director his wines are outstanding as well.
 
 
Oh, I like Coppola's reds...
and some of us had a bit of it when we went the the cafe in SF, didn't we, Diane..
but, I've never ever had a glass of Chateau Lafitte, '78 or any other year. And, as long as there is some left, I'd appreciate having it in a special glass. I'll have to go looking for the kind of glass I mean...

 http://www.nextag.com/Riedel_Sommeliers_Maxi_Bordeaux~62263665z27znz2700058zz1z2700058zzmainz2-htm 
 
 
Yes, CJ, as in osso's reply. God I love to hear girls being all giggly and loud, but then I've never had to live with them! Relax and I'll find the nicest merlot I can find.

Osso, now that I'm old (but feeling younger than ever), I indulge in good drinks, whether it is Maker's Mark bourbon or good champagne (which I LOVE). Since I don't drink much, I figure the expense is very much worth it.
 
 
Beer steins are not allowed Osso  
 
 
Oh Diane, you are so very precious. Thank you so very much for your kind words :-D Now come on over and sit next to me ;-)

What a lovely group we have in here :-D

Takes another sip of wine.
 
 
dys enters the grotto with a brown paper bag and sits between Diane and Montana. dys says to eva "I'd like to see, and the sooner the better, a clean whisky glass"
 
 
Montana scoots over to give Dyslexia a little more space, but not too much space, as I don't want to interfere with that coziness :-D
 
 
Montana, sweet girl that she is, doesn't mention the odor emanating from Dys. She compliments him on his boots, wishing he would go wash them, or something, and he says, always the gentleman, "Why thank you maam, they are Tony Lamas and very comfortable. Why, I always wear them when riding my favorite mule, Old Jumpy." Here, would you like to see the special stitching?" Montana, gasping, askes Jacques for a stiff drink of anything!
 
 
Why, dys! Of course you can BYOB here anytime! I believe I have just the "shot glass" for you...

 

Jacques, perhaps we should think about stocking some single malt whiskeys. What do you think of that? Oh, please don't frown like that, Jacques. I know your expertise is in vintage wines. I wouldn't ask you to serve just anything. I'll find you an assistant to help out. There now, stop pouting! I promise...an assistant...yes, first thing tomorrow.

<thinking, thinking...I should find a pretty girl for this...Jacques likes blondes, I believe...>
 
 
Montana belts down her stiff one and turns to Dys saying "well, now I'm ready for anything, so show me your stuff"!

Eva
Well, hell!!! I ain't no blond, so we gotta find us a blond.
 
 
Hmmm, wasn't there a blonde girl named Bambi? Not too bright, but pretty and helpful.
 
 
 http://chiaroart.com/index/glassware/framingmartini2.jpg   

Glasses like this makes me wish I liked martinis. I might buy a couple and drink vodka tonics or even orange juice out of them.
 
 
 
Francis, we are so looking forward to meeting you in London. Do me a favor when we meet for dinner--choose the wine. I love fairly light wines, red or white, but I have no sophistication when it comes to labels or types of wine.
 

It will be my pleasure, choosing you the wine! I'll give advice depending on what we are going to eat.

Besides, I'll give you a bottle from my own cellar!
 
 
Bambi? oh yeah I remember her. She had a balcony you could do Shakespeare off of. I never understood why she dyed her roots brown. She did have that nasty gag reflex that distrupted things from time to time although she was a perky little trooper.
 
 
Hahaha dys, that's a funny description  

When are you having your get together in London?
I'll be in June in Europe, but mainly Munich plus a little
visit to Prague, and maybe a stop over in London
(if the airfare is cheaper with British Airways).

It's too early to drink red wine and since my child's
energy level is still in slow gear, I relax with a
cup of espresso.

Salute!
 
 
ACK!

Now to a refined and uplifting view (not of Bambi's 'shelf')...

 
Georgian ale flute, circa 1750
 
 
Get together in May 1st.
I'll be in London friday april 30, back May 2.
 
 
 

Edwardian champagne flute, circa 1910
 
 
Here is a link to the site, so I don't take up the entire thread with gorgeous pictures. I'm drooling--there are times when I wish I were rich.

 http://www.laurieleighantiques.com 
 
 
Beautiful glass Diane. Perfect for some Moet & Chandon
or Veuve Clicquot
 
 
Oh Calamity Jane, I want some. I guess Jacques can get virtually anything, can't he?

I'll try not to slurp.
 
 
Oh, May 1st is too early for me, unfortunately.

Diane, virtually you can get whatever you want,
if you can find Jacques. The last time I saw him,
he was going into the cellar with bambi <oh la la>
 
 
I'll get it for you.

Here a Veuve Clicquot :

 
 
 
I'd like a glass of that, thank you, and maybe no one will notice if I abscond with the nice wooden box...
 
 
Hi, Osso, come join and cheers with us.

(I'll put the box in your car)!
 
 
Cheers, all, and what a lovely morning it is here, with skies of blue and a bit of the warmth of the sun shining down.
 
 
Warming our hearts with those words!
 
 
<door swings wide open. A figure clatters in.>

I'll have a St. Francis Merlot from the early 90's if there is any left in the world and some baked brie and perhaps a few rounds of some crunchy bread and do you have any fried olives?

Wait. I should find a seat first. Oh, there's one by the patio door.

Joe (settles in and falls asleep) Nation
 
 
Hi Joe!

I think Jacques could bring you this : 1991 St. Francis Reserve Merlot, Sonoma Valley ($24).
Very fragrant, with lots of toasty oak balanced by deep, ripe cassis-berry fruit and mild spice. Rich and plumy on the palate offering concentrated, delicious fruit framed in spicy oak and a hint of earthiness; silky smooth and elegant, with medium tannins
 
 
Hmmm, is that the Kenwood winery's St. Francis vineyard...
My Napa friends took me on a winery tour when I first moved up here, the high point of which was an incredible lunch at the Kenwood restaurant, and then the wife - a friend from college - and I hopping out of the car to pose by some old growth vines in that vineyard. Ah, I am thinking of their old growth zinfandel vines.

edit to say I can't find info on it being zinfandel (how soon we forget!)
Now I'll have to email my Napa pals to satisfy my curiosity.
 
 
This one if from Behler (St Francis)Vineyard.

Visiting vineyards is always an exciting experience.

See  St Francis 
 
 
To make up for my confusion I'll bring a few bottles of this old vine zinfandel, which comes with memories. When my friends met me in Sacramento, where I had a painting exhibit, and took me to their victorian house in Napa, we arrived around eleven at night. They showed me the guest room, which had the four poster situated in a round cupola, with lots of fluffy pillows and a large vase filled to almost falling over with roses from their garden. And would you like a sip of wine before retiring? Sure, I said, though I was exhausted. We went back downstairs to the parlour - definitely a parlour, not a 'living room' - and Jim asked me what kind of wine I liked. I said a wine with a lot of taste, sort of like an old single malt scotch is to a young blend... but that I am no connoisseur, what with having close to no sense of smell and no learning...

He came back in a few minutes with a bottle of this zinfandel - though it was an earlier year - which he poured into three gorgeous old wineglasses, and it was perfect...  http://www.thewineguru.com/renwoodzin97.htm 
 
 
<enter's cautiously, looks around and asks>

any chance of getting a beer

something like this

 
 
 
I suspect there is, djj...
 
 
 
 
 
The only wines I am familiar with come in boxes.(with a handy spout)
 
 
more packable...
 
 
and yeah there is Thunderbird and Mad Dog 20-20
 
 
Hi, Dys, what about a bourbon?

Osso, keep you bottles three more years. It will be fine then.
 
 
ah yes fine american whisky, there are several from which to choose Makers Mark or George Dickel are generally my picks. Just don't pour no Jack in my glass.
 
 
I'm not used to yours, but time to time, I take a little "four roses".
 
 
fortunately you must have better taste in wines.
 
 
I guess you would say that  

But time to time, one must acomplish some duties.
 
 
I like those whiskeys (whiskies?) too, hic!
 
 
M-W online says you can use booze..err..both!
 
 
 

i'd rather have a bottle in front of me, than a frontal lobotomy
 
 
I heard back from my Napa friends (not that it is of vital interest to anyone else...) -
"Indeed St. Francis winery turned the grapes from the old Pagani vineyard nearby into a luscious zin. How pretty the old vineyard was that day with us standing amongst the old head pruned vines."
So, t'was a zin.
 
 
Well, sad news, folks. I've had to let Bambi go. Poor girl didn't last a day here. Not only did she not know a merlot from a zinfandel, but I caught her saying, "Boo-juh-lase no-voo" in that nasal tone of hers, and it set my teeth on edge. <shudder>

Sorry I haven't been quite as attentive today. I've been interviewing replacements. (Last time I hire someone strictly on Dys & Diane's recommendations! Stunning glassware though, Diane. I believe I will order some of those for us.)

I think I've found the perfect assistant for Jacques. Meet Sophie. She's quite knowledgeable about wines, and she also makes a mean baked brie. She used to have her own restaurant, so I'll be relying on her to keep an eye on things. Oh...and if you'd rather have beer or bourbon, just ask her. She'll be happy to pour you one of our house specialties or, of course, you may BYOB. ("Bring Your Own Bottle"...a common abbreviation...for our European guests.)

 
 
 
Oh, and help yourself to some of Sophie's baked brie!

 

It's topped with brown sugar, butter & almonds. Yummy! You'll find it over on the buffet along with a basket of sliced baguettes.
 
 
 

i've brought along a ploughman's lunch, to go with my beer

 

feel free to join me though, the figs are delicious
 
 
Francis, you are a wonder for finding the Veuve Clicquot. Champagne, to me is liquid magic. Nothing matches the feeling I get drinking champagne. "The night they invented champagne..."

Now, for another side of Francis, you really must explain your taste in whiskies and that cryptic comment:

 
But time to time, one must acomplish some duties.  
 

Eva, sorry for Bambi. I should have known that anyone named Bambi would have some serious mental problems; besides, Dys was a little too absorbed by that, er, shelf--or maybe he just had Shakespeare on his mind. LOL

Baked brie, baguettes, ah heaven. I've found some rocquefort-stuffed green olives that are addictive which I'll bring along. Oooh, what about some fancy caviar? Jacques should be able to find some in the pantry. I've never had the real thing, but I do love the kind you can get in nice groceries here. Love that little burst of salty amniotic fluid when they pop as you bite down.
 
 
djjd62, tell me what a ploughman's lunch contains. Also, that beer looks super strong. What is it?
 
 
 
Eva, sorry for Bambi. I should have known that anyone named Bambi would have some serious mental problems; besides, Dys was a little too absorbed by that, er, shelf--or maybe he just had Shakespeare on his mind. LOL
 

Don't worry about her too much, Diane. I put her in a cab, gave her $100, and sent her over to Hooters. I'm sure she'll have another job in no time.

More champagne?
 
 
 
djjd62, tell me what a ploughman's lunch contains. Also, that beer looks super strong. What is it?
 

the traditional ploughmans lunch as i understand it was a rough brown bread, with cheese and fruit, some variations include perserves or relishes and pickles

the beer is a belgian trappist beer, i've not had it for a few years now, but it's an excellent brew, and at 9%, the wine bottle size portion is just about enough

here's a professional description from  the oxford bottled beer database 

It has a powerful, sour nose, almost like a gueuze or a Belgian red ale. However, the palate is much more balanced than you would expect, with the sourness countered effectively by a rich, warming maltiness, a fair helping of hoppy bitterness and a hint of phenols giving it a lively, menthol lightness on the tongue. Spices are abundant, including cloves and pepper. Fruit is present too, notably juniper berries. There is also a winey, sherry feel on the back of the palate, hinting at its strength - with the spices, this gives it an almost mulled wine quality, but without the sweetness. Aftertaste is surprisingly light, with fading spices and malt. To summarise, Grande Réserve is an astoundingly complex, rich, yet very drinkable vintage offering from this trappist brewery - we suspect it will become even more complex with age, but we couldn't wait to find out.
 
 
 
Now, for another side of Francis, you really must explain your taste in whiskies and that cryptic comment:

 
But time to time, one must acomplish some duties.  
 

.
 

Well, this duties have to do with some social/professional meetings. As Four Roses is a really widespread bourbon in France, not to speak of Europe, sometimes you can not have another brand than this one in those meetings. (a matter of costs?)

At home, I've always, at least, "The famous grouse" and "Ballantines" but also "Chivas" twelve years old.

Having tasted it, Glenfiddich is also a good choice.
 
 
I'm not sure if I've had Glenfiddich eighteen...

I have found, in italy anyway, that their bar/cafes are stocked with what to us are young single malts, 5 year olds, if they have any at all. Of course I have failed to check all the bars, I must fix that.

Imagine my amazement when I was wandering around Heathrow International killing time while suffering with my typical airplane-airport nasal allergy (I think it's some disinfectant they use) and John and I would individually wander off while waiting, the other one watching the bags - that the bar had no single malt scotches.

Now it makes sense to me, I guess you have to go to Scotland to find a real array. Am learning how the different areas of Europe are idiosyncratically themselves, even as some of the very local treasures are in danger of being lost re hygiene rules (cave aged cheeses...)
 
 
 
Am learning how the different areas of Europe are idiosyncratically themselves, even as some of the very local treasures are in danger of being lost re hygiene rules (cave aged cheeses...)
 

As you say, globalization is on the way.
 
 
Eva, I see you had this erected by the main highway....I bet it will be visible to people up to 20 miles away  

 
 
 
I don't like to drink hard liquor, so a glass of Pinot Noir
would do just fine for me right now, while unwinding
from the typical Monday rat race.
 
 
Ah, Francis. Is Four Roses scotch or bourbon? Bob (Dys) and I like bourbon. You and osso are talking of scotch. I'd love to try a good single malt sometime.
 
 
Four Roses must have fallen out of favor, at least amongst the people with whom I drink. Growing up, there was always a bottle of it on the top shelf of of the kitchen corner cabinet in case one of the Irish uncle priests should stop by and on Christmas morning (Christmas Morning! My mother was mortified.) my father's hunting buddies would come by to show off the new shotguns and have a short one, neat, no ice and a quick short refill for luck in the New Year, but I don't think I've seen a bottle since then. My father discovered that Manhattans tasted better if they were made with bourbon instead of whiskey and I think that ended the use of Four Roses in our house.

It's nice to hear the name though, it reminded me of all those long evenings on the front porch in the Connecticut summer. The neighborhood mothers would gather together, sharing stories of shopping adventures, failing marriages and mosquito preventatives while drinking from large glasses of whisky and soda or gin and lemonade. From the corner of Valley Street you could see their cigarettes glowing in the dark and hear their laughter soar up into the starry night.

This sounds like the beginning of a longer tale and it is, but for now, we'll leave it be.

Joe (I'll take a small Jameson, please. Just from the bottle, no ice.)Nation
 
 
Er, isn't bourbon also whiskey, she says stupidly.

I got a neat irish from the Grocery Outlet a while ago, let me go reclaim the bottle. The bottle was truly weird, divided into three, making three charming flasks for, lemme think, near the stove olive oil, canola, etc. 'Clontarf' was the name, not very catchy, I admit, but tasty.

Osso likes bourbons too. She is indiscriminate re type of booze, but only likes the good tasting ones within each category. Scniff. Otherwise one might as well snuggle up to some ethanol.
 
 
Okay, after dinner I will have some Calvados to digest.

Joe, your story reminds me of the 2 summers I have
spent in Connecticut with an italian family in Old Lyme.
Brings back good memories....
 
 
You won't be surprised that I love Calvados...

I'm not quite the sot I sound.

Have been introduced to these items by a friend of ours who stocked all the good stuff...
 
 
I remember a lovely veal dish I had once, prepared with Calvados. As luck would have it, I've found one bottle of it back in one of the dusty corners. Here, we'll have Jacques pour us a couple.

Oh, and Joe...please come back and tell us more stories. This is just the place for it!

Speaking of dusty corners, I think I've decided not to clean up the place too much more. It will lose its atmosphere.
 
 
Joe, what a lovely story. In my redneck family, if there had been any alcohol in the house, my grandmother would have had cardiac arrest!!

Jo. LOL, I'm not the sot I sound either, but I do love Calvados. I used to make something wonderful with it, but have forgotten, it's been so long. Maybe it was a pear, gorgonzola and walnut tart. That was YUM!!
 
 
So then let's continue drinking Calvados.
A cuban cigar would be nice too. Let's kick it up girls,
and have a grand time !
 
 
Sounds like a plan, Calmity Jane. Later we can have some Chambourd. That nectar is capable of taking me to another plane or a French chateau in the French Alps. Huge fire, fine company, ah, heaven.
 
 
 
it reminded me of all those long evenings on the front porch in the Connecticut summer. The neighborhood mothers would gather together, sharing stories of shopping adventures, failing marriages and mosquito preventatives while drinking from large glasses of whisky and soda or gin and lemonade. From the corner of Valley Street you could see their cigarettes glowing in the dark and hear their laughter soar up into the starry night.

This sounds like the beginning of a longer tale and it is
 

This story I know well. It's mine, beggining in May ending in October, in my house in the countryside near Paris, with family and friends.
Large view over the Seine valley, starry nights, southernwood around, laughters...
 
 
Francis, another lovely image. What a nice way to start my day.
 
 
Yes, let's all go the countryside in France and enjoy a
couple of redwines there....

That reminds me of an episode of "Absolutely Fabulous"
when Edwina and Patsy went to France for vacation
and got lost while being drunk. Great episode!  
 
 
Diane and CJ, I'd be glad to have you here!

It would be "Absolutely Fabulous"!
 
 
You sit yourself right back down, CJ! That's an order! (Refill her glass, Jacques.)

I'll bring France here for you.

Since you mentioned Chambord, we'll start there. Here's a lovely, mystical night shot.

 

We'll find a nearby B&B where we can stay. Then, when we wake, we can take a short stroll into town. Perhaps we can stop by the patisserie for a quick breakfast before sightseeing...

 

(Pssst....feel free to post more photos! Where would you like to go?)
 
 
well, the lady diane, meself and the C. Imposter are taking the chunnel to Amsterdam and we all knows what that means!
 
 
Buying tulips, dys?

<snicker>

Francis, please feel free to share photos of your favorite spots...we'd love it!!!
 
 
This links you to a place ten minutes from my countryside house :  Fontainebleau 
 
 
Beautiful Francis. I'm packing my bags!!

Sorry Eva, but this is too good to pass up. Fluff up the guest room Francis. If we're more people we could charter a lear jet
and celebrate a bit before arrival.

Singing: I am leaving on a jet plane, don't know when I'll
be back again.......
 
 
Ooh, really Francis?! (Is it actually Francis, or Francois?)

Nevermind the B&B, gals...we're staying with Francis!!!
 
 
Oh my gosh!
 
 
Calm down! Let's organise the charter!
 
 
Okay, everybody on board!

 

Sure hope you don't mind...we invited a few friends.
Hope this plane can get off the ground.
Some of them brought a lot of luggage.

 

Hooray! We made lift-off! Look out, Francis, here we come!!!
 
 
That's okay Eva. My house friends rooms can afford a Lear jet capacity.

BTW, my name is really Francis.
 
 
Gosh, I hate flying!

 
 
 
CJ. Make a cruise to Europe!
 
 
That takes too long Francis.
Maybe one day, when I'm retired, I'll opt for that.

For now, I endure the flight  
After all I brought 2 bottles Cabernet Sauvignon in my
carry on.
 
 
omigod fontainbleau.

When I see places like this,
and Francis- that is some site-
so beautiful-so sweepingly beautiful like the place it shows,
when I see places like Fontainbleau,
I wonder,

who were these people?
Who built this place
and placed little drops of their sweat
and blood
in between the stones
and
who were these people who lived in these rooms
bursting with gold and jewels and finery??

People so close to gods
humans so beyond humanity
places so beyond places
palaces beyond the simple palaces
of the common gods.

I

I have no real words
only poetry.

Joe (bread, not cake) Nation
 
 
I have a book at work that I bought used from my local source, Bookleggers, on French Chateaux. I am particularly fond of one, name starts with C. I know that's no help. Back on that, domani.

Bread, the staff of life, says Osso.
 
 
Is it a winery château, or some like I show you?
 
 
That's a very chic name for a wine bar ! "Eva's"

Rise, shine and celebrate - roll out the red carpet, the prince is here !
 
 
Oh, WONDERFUL! The Prince is here! Jacques, please pour him whatever he wants.

I'm so glad you approve of the place, G!

I realize you're a bit jetlagged, but please do join us on our virtual trip to Francis's France. (More pictures, please!)
 
 
Wake up, everybody! It's been a long flight, but we're almost there. If you look out the windows on the right side of the Lear jet, you can see the Paris airport.

 

Wake up, CJ, dear. It's time to fasten your seatbelt and return your tray table to its upright and locked position.
 
 
Eva, it's such a beautiful view...ohhh, but it's spinning...I must have drank too much wine...
 
 
After your landing, you are at one hour car away of this :

 
 
 
And I prepare a drink, choose your glass!

 
 
 
Oh, look! Francis has sent a limo to pick us up!

 
 
 
My God, we'll arrive in style. I guess I look pretty
out of place now with my ol sweat pants and redwine soiled t-shirt  
 
 
 
My God, we'll arrive in style. I guess I look pretty
out of place now with my ol sweat pants and redwine soiled t-shirt  
 

Don't worry Calamity, I used my virtual Mastercard and treated us all to makeovers and evening wear.
Don't we all look great?  

 
   
 
 
if that's what y'all look like, I'm staying home. I prefer women that look like women, not decorations.
 
 
Thank you colorbook, but I guess we'll have to tone
it down, otherwise dys won't come.

dys, give us a visual idea how your idea of a woman looks like.
 
 
If we take off our decorations we'll get arrested.
 
 
Not in France dear  
 
 
Oh okay, I almost forgot...we'll have to see what kind styles he prefers on women and then dress accordingly  ...that dress was a bit confining anyway.
 
 
ok here's a pic of Diana Rigg, someone I would consider very attractive
 
 
 
Oh okay dys, I think, we can pull that one off.
I remember her wearing this black, leathery catsuit....

Diana Rigg it is   She's still attractive by the way.
 
 
Indeed she is still attactive. I don't think I could ever look like her, but at least I don't have to try for the airbrushed models.

Eva, the pic of Chambord is pure fantasy--I must go there sometime fairly soon!

Francis--Fontainebleau is fabulous--ab fab. There is even a Jardin De Diane. Naturally, she was my ancestor...

What beautiful scenery, fine drink and food and, best of all, the finest company imaginable, especially if Joe (bread not cake) Nation and The Prince join the rest of us at Francis' chateau.

Hey Prince, how ya doin'? I can hardly wait to meet you in London. You are one of my original, long time favorite a2kers.
 
 
Diana Rigg, eh, Dys? Well, at Eva's we aim to please. If it's catsuits you want, it's catsuits you get. Here's yours.

 
 
 
yeah I know Diana was well known for the cat suit (and the leather)but really folks she was actually a dedicated actor on the Shakespere Stage with a wonderful and long lasting career. If you take a look at the pic of her that I posted it is NOT of the cat suit/leather genre but rather the face of a woman I find attractive because I see in it character not found in the plastic like models of which I first objected. (It was reported by a critic of one of her performances on the stage that she had inadequate "buttresses")
 
 
Yeah, but that was for a nude scene...
 
 
Admirable sentiments, dys. You will fit in well in France. They admire women of character.

I still think that catsuit would fit you rather nicely, though. And surely it would amuse the French.
 
 
I still dont have a drink.....

Maybe if you get me drunk enough, I will tell you abt "him"
 
 
Ooooooh, where's Jacques?
 
 
Yeah, I would like to have an Aperitif before going
out into the cruel, cold business world. Jacques doesn't
get up before 9 am (PST).

And what happened to Francis? Is he housecleaning
and preparing the guest rooms for us or what?

Dys, I think we all look pretty normal and won't
compete with the frilly, skinny models.  
 
 
My house is ready for guests. But I work when you sleep!
Let's take a drink!
 
 
You want ANOTHER bottle of champagne, G? You've been through two already!!! Well, go ahead and finish off my Calvados. Here...

Now look...we're on Francis's street now. I wonder which of these houses is his? (I do hope this driver knows where he's going. I don't speak much French, you know.)

Is this it? What a lovely place!

 

No, that wasn't it. Maybe it's this charming cottage. But would it have room enough for all of us?

 

Ooh, maybe it's this Art Deco!

 

Oh wait. Here it is! And there's Francis out front, waiting for us!

 
 
 
oops, double post - I got too excited  
 
 
Oh how nice is that!
I might never leave......
 
 
Eva, hints :

Mullen's nicer!

Fontainebleau's more haussmanian and bigger than Jay's! :wink:
 
 
Mullen's IS nice, but the thought of all those stairs....  

Um...are we to stay at Fontainebleau, then?!
 
 
Near, near.

Just ten minutes away, I told you!

Obviously, we'll visit "Le château de Fontainebleau" and it's gardens. Le jardin de Diane is magnificent!

After, I'll manage to take you to a Paris' grand tour!
 
 
We're ready!

Um...on second thought...give us a few hours to sleep off the jet lag first, okay?

Then away we go!!!
 
 
Oh boy, what a day. Jacques, could you bring me a bottle of your finest white wine please. I just got back from scolding a naughty child and I'm ready for a drink or ten.
 
 
Close your eyes, close your door
You don't have to worry any more
Kick your shoes off, do not fear
Bring that bottle over here.
 
 
Sure, you can sleep. The house is very quiet.
As you woke up, can I offer you this, before a really "petit-déjeuner" :
 
 
 
 
Close your eyes, close your door
You don't have to worry any more
Kick your shoes off, do not fear
Bring that bottle over here.
 

Yeah, yeah, that's the ticket. You gonna share this here bottle with me Dys  
 
 
Cheers you two!
 
 
Cheers yourself Francis :-D Now slide on in here and help us out with drinking this here bottle ;-)
 
 
Well I've had a very productive day,
so I deserve a reward. Champagne for me, please.
 
 
Champagne....Oh yummy :-D I love the bubbly myself.
 
 
Well, I need to wake up. I see Francis has brought me some orange juice. Now, if Montana will just pass that champagne over this way...voila!

 

Mmmmm....and now, I think I will have one of those croissants, if there are any left. I do hope Dys didn't eat them all.
 
 
Tell him they're tofo croissants and Dys will not touch them ;-)

Passes the champagne over to Eva :-D
 
 
Someone asked the difference between whiskey and bourbon. In order to be designated a bourbon the liquor must contain more than 51 percent corn with the remainder being produced from other grains.

Please pass the corn in the form of a Manhattan:
1 to 2 shots of Maker's Mark
1/2 shot of sweet vermouth
a dash of bitters
over ice or shaken and poured straight up.

I am enjoying my vegetables without ice.

Joe (who put the orange juice in the champagne? Is this breakfast?)Nation
 
 
 
(who put the orange juice in the champagne? Is this breakfast?)
 

As a matter of fact, Joe...YES.

 
Sure, you can sleep. The house is very quiet.
As you woke up, can I offer you this, before a really "petit-déjeuner" :
 
 
 
 
oh my gawd I've over slept!!!!

Too late to go to work.

Pour me another and please someone call me in sick.

Joe( So.....uh........... no..... I can't think of anything clearly...) Nation
 
 
Well, of course not. It's jet lag. We're operating on Paris time now.
 
 
So, Francis, it appears we're all awake now and properly fed. How about that tour you promised? Where shall we start?
 
 
I think I did mean Chenonceaux, then, but not so much now. It was a progenitor of gardens, re water use...

eye on Vaux le Vicomte....

more on that one later.

(please understand, though I had a very quick survey class years ago, I know less now, since I know more. Thus, I'm a blank slate...)
 
 
 
So, Francis, it appears we're all awake now and properly fed. How about that tour you promised? Where shall we start?
 

Before I take you to Paris, I would like to show you the Fontainebleau surroudings!

Some nice places I'm sure you'd like.

Let's begin with Moret-sur-Loing, famous for it's painters like Sisley, English born but long living and dead here.
 
 
 
One more of Moret, before going to Barbizon, which I guess will delight Osso!

 
 
 
Heading to Barbizon, impressionist painters place.

Corot, Millet, Rousseau, Seurat and many others were here.

Stop to take some drink here :  

Osso, here's Rousseau:  

And a link I like :  Florence Griswold museum 
 
 
 
I think I did mean Chenonceaux, then, but not so much now. It was a progenitor of gardens, re water use...
eye on Vaux le Vicomte....
 

After a little chat here in Barbizon we'll head to Vaux le Vicomte, twenty minutes from here!

Chenonceau being two hours away, I'll just show you the pictures.
 
 
Oh, this is so much fun! I loved the Moret pictures...
 
 
Beautiful pictures Francis.

But I need something to drink fast. We just came from
the soccer field (little Jane's team lost) and I feel so
cold. What will warm me up the fastest?
 
 
Oh, how gorgeous, Francis! What a treat! I'd like to spend all afternoon staring at Morey! If you weren't already a painter when you first came there, that first view alone would be enough to make you put brush to canvas.

Here, CJ. I had them put some hot tea with lemon in a "go cup" back at the tea bar. You can have it. And here's un petit eclair for Little Jane, poor darling.

 
 
 
Francis, these pictures are stunning!

The Florence Griswald Museum is delightful and Old Lyme is still an artist's colony even though the city has become larger and somewhat suburbanized. I lived not too far from there before I moved to New Mexico.

Calamity, thank dear Eva and quickly eat the damned eclair. I just started the Atkins diet and it (the eclair) is making me drool.
 
 
How sweet of you Eva, I love to drink tea in the evening,
and the eclair looks so tempting, but I will have little Jane
eat it.....oh, maybe I'll try a tiny bit of it.
Thank you Eva!

Diane, I thought with Atkinks you can eat all that?
I love bread and pasta, so I couldn't live without it.
 
 
I'm afraid the eclair would not be okay with Atkins, CJ. Nor with South Beach, which I am on. But of course I am making an exception while we are in France. You gotta live!

On with the tour, Francis!
 
 
We are arriving at Vaux-le-Vicomte!

 
 
 
Smiling...
 
 
Take a look from the other side!

 
 
 
Look inside!

 
 
 
A last one :

 

And a link to the history of  Vaux-le-Vicomte 
 
 
and here is one more nifty site -

 vaux le vicomte 
 
 
a link to  Chenonceau 
 
 
Well, so far my favorites image is that of Moret...
 
 
A really nice living place! I would be glad to take you there.
 
 
If I ever make it over to France...
I would like to visit it with you.
 
 
It's fifteen minutes from my house. I often go there for the restaurants.
 
 
You and your family are lucky... it's really lovely.
Hmmm, restaurants..
 
 
That was a very nice trip indeed. Thank you Francis,
we shall reciprocate if you ever make it to southern California,
or northern Cal to see osso  
 
 
Yes, thank you Francis, it was a very nice trip  
 
 
Eva, you were wonderful to start this thread--it was sorely needed.

Francis, the tour is making a trip to France irresistable. Dys and I would also like to invite you to stay with us if you ever travel to New Mexico. The landscape here is extremely different from that of France but its beauty is compelling.

Osso, I think you must be a direct descendant of the landscape designers in your post.
 
 
Hey, the trip's not finished! We must come to Paris!

(Thanks a lot for the offers!)
 
 
 Restaurants near Fontainbleau and Moret 
 
 
PARIS! Ah, Paris...

First though, I feel obligated to try all the restaurants on osso's list.
 
 
Some fine restaurants in Paris for you too, Diane -
 Paris restaurants from Epicurious 
 
 
 
 Restaurants near Fontainbleau and Moret 
 

Some of those are, for sure, nices places, not only for food but also for "decor".

However, I've some places, not yet in the internet (traditions) I'll invite you to.

I'm trying to gather pictures for those around Fontainebleau and in Paris.
 
 
looking forward to them..
 
 
Go on ahead, I'll catch up!

Took the full tour at Vaux-le-Vicomtes (fascinating history! Didn't realize this was the place that inspired Versailles), then took the garden tours at Chenonceau. Just exquisite! I'm looking over their wines right now...they said they'd ship some back to the Wine Cellar for us.

Carry on...
 
 
By the way, Sophie called last evening. Seems there's a troublesome leak in the ceiling at the Wine Cellar. (She's been looking after the place for us while we're gone.) There's water all over the floor behind the bar. I didn't know what to tell her. Osso, you're our architect...how exactly does one fix a leak in a cave?
 
 
We'll first turn on the pump, and then call in the A2k structural engineers...
 
 
Perhaps we can divert it into an attract "rill"...
link to follow.
 
 
This is a lovely link for Villa Lante - it has black and white photos. Lante is designed with two villas poised at either side of a long water course, which flows from a grotto uphill down through various fountains in line between the villas down to a lower pool.

We could adapt from this to have a Water Table (see the second photo - which gives a place to cool the white wine on the terrace - and the fourth, with the "rill", a stepped water spillway).

 http://www.erikfiss.com/foto/pics/villalantebomarzo/ 
 
 
Now, that is just brilliant, osso! Leave it to the Italians to come up with the most elegant solutions. Wow. Wait 'til Sophia gets a look at this! I'll have her call your office and schedule the construction immediately. Perhaps it could even be finished in time for our celebration when we return from France!

Francis, do you have a fax machine that osso could use? She needs to send drawings to Sophia at once for approval.
 
 
Hmmm, drawings of Villa Lante, I so wish....

but it is, among landscape architects at least, usually thought of as the most coherent design among italian gardens. (Or was, when I was into these studies).

John and I were there in March. We hadn't slept much, another story, and J was particularly grumpy as we tried to catch the train from Rome, which wasn't where we thought it should be at piazza Flaminio, but a half block away... anyway, we got the last train to Viterbo, and then the small train to Bagnaia, and then walked up to the Villa - and they were closed for lunch. My husband was ready to kill me, me, who had heard of this place in school and had it in my sights.

One desultory guy wandered out and said avanti, and we went in. We were the only people in the place, with great winds gusting.

He took us into one of the villas - I am positive it was so he could get out of the wind, which was taking down sycamore branches. In the meantime, I had come three thousand miles to see this place and was rather avid. (I'll have to post a photo of me there sometime).

Well, up to the grotto and back, me lingering, the guide leading by some increasing number of feet.
(Yes, we did give him a goodly tip, which he deserved, poor lamb(!)

Afterwards we had a good lunch in a nice trattoria, whose name I can find if not right this minute, and then we tried to catch the bus back to Rome.

But, we didn't have tickets.

We went into the Bar and John begged, did anyone know how we could catch the bus. John doesn't speak italian. Lotta arm waving. I burble some italian words. It's only men in there in the dark...

One fellow collects tickets from the guys at the bar and walks us out.

John tries to buy them a round.

No!

I will always love Bagnaia.

As the bus was leaving we saw the lead guy with his hod carrying apparatus... going across the piazza.
 
 
Oh, and after that, after the short train to Viterbo, we were standing at the Viterbo to Roma stazione and a woman came over to us...

and offered us some of her chocolate bar.

Which we took, happily.

Which is part of why I went back to Viterbo, in 1999, the earlier part of this happening in 1993.
 
 
I forgot to mention the hod carrier who had been the one talking to John, had spent time in Argentina, which worked with John's flailing Spanish... and so they connected however slightly.

Not as far a leap as people might think as John's folks were Minnesota farmers and his dad only got to fourth grade through no fault of his own.
 
 
Fascinating. You would be great to travel with.
 
 
We've killed off several bottles of wine, waiting...

<hic> Where shall we go next, Francis?
 
 
To a gay bar - I have heard French men are very considerate lovers...wanna give it a shot again - maybe I will be thrid time lucky
 
 
Well, then, tap, tap, tap...
 
 
Yes!

TAP, TAP, TAP, TAP.......

(Where are you Francis?)
 
 
Preparing to go out in Paris!
Coming soon!
 
 
Oh, no no no Prince, Francis belongs to us, and we
won't share, right girls?

We bonden for the last 21 pages with Francis, and
he travels well (hardly any guy does), we have
history together and will continue traveling the countryside
of France with him.

There might be room for you as a passenger, but not
as love interest. He's ours!  
 
 
Hey CJ - what happened to equal oppurtunties ???  
 
 
Good point prince. Have you asked Francis already
if he's up to a flexible workout schedule?  
 
 
My dear prince, I think you drove Francis away,
which proves, he's not gay  
 
 
Surely we can find you an acceptable substitute in "Gay Paree"?  
 
 
Has Francis abandoned us in the middle of Paris? Oh dear. I suppose we could call a taxi and go back to the airport.  
 
 
Francis is the middle of something, but you can count on him!

Be back soon to resume our Paris tour!
 
 
Sorry, just to clarify - when I said "gay bar" I *did* not mean Francis !!
 
 
Eva
Eva, a slight digression. Remembering the fun we had at your villa in Venice, I have bad news. The Gondoliers in Venice are on strike.

BBB

No gondolas for Valentine's Day

Venetian gondoliers, enraged by a ban on boating at night, have gone on strike - spoiling many a couple's dream of a Valentine's Day boat trip.
The Italian city, concerned over a range of problems caused by waves, has introduced strict traffic rules.

Gondolas cannot take to the canals between 0100-1030, when deliveries of goods are made by bigger boats.

But gondoliers say the ban is unfair and are threatening to carry on their protest until the ban is revoked.

At the town hall, a spokeswoman would not say whether the mayor, Paolo Costa, was considering scrapping the night-time ban.

"The waves cause well-known problems to Venice's buildings, and the new regulations were meant to preserve their stability and fight erosion," she told the BBC News website.

"The canals are incredibly busy these days. There are cargo boats, public waterbuses, water taxis, fire brigade boats.

"The growing volume of water traffic poses a threat to the safety of passengers, too."

'Unfair'

Traffic has been staggered for all types of boats, but gondoliers feel they have been treated unfairly.

''The new regulations are inconclusive - gondolas and all other rowing boats should be completely exempted from it,'' the gondoliers told Italian news agency ADN Kronos.

On Monday they were staging a mass protest in front of the town hall building, hundreds of their distinctive vessels "parked" just metres away from the Rialto Bridge, one of Venice's top attractions.

The rally provided an unusual photo opportunity - a meagre consolation for the many disappointed Valentine tourist couples, most of whom will probably leave Venice before the strike is over.

Story from BBC NEWS:
 http://news.bbc.co.uk/go/pr/fr/-/2/hi/europe/4264831.stm 

Published: 2005/02/14 15:56:14 GMT
 
 
Well, since Francis is busy ironing out the details of our tour of Paris, we might as well digress.

I'm on the gondoliers' side, BBB. Their historical contribution should be respected and protected. Motorized boats are the ones that should be more heavily restricted due to the damage they are causing.

Ah, but then Italy wouldn't be Italy without strikes, you know.
 
 
And this strike got to the heart of it, eh?
<sorry, I just couldn't help it>
 
 
Eva
I searched in my memory closet, found my old labor union hat and donned it in support of the Gondoliers. I would walk their picket line but I no longer can walk on water.

BBB
 
 
If it weren't for Italy, anarchism wouldn't have the good name it now enjoys.
 
 
True, dys.

LOL, osso!

I'd suggest an online petition in support of the gondoliers, BBB, but that's just too anachronistic.  
 
 
Anachronistic, walking on water? Anarchistic as a way to go.
Go! Gondoliers...

(er, this being neither here nor there, I just finished the thriller, Pompeii...)
 
 
No, "anachronistic" as in (lemme look this up)...anything that seems to be out of its proper time in history. As in, medieval gondoliers vs. online petitions. Make sense now?
 
 
Chronosynclastic infudibulum = those places... where all the different kinds of truths fit together at, more or less, the same time.
anarchistic infudibulum = those places where Italians go to eat where it's required to speak, gesticulate, chew, vote, pray and swallow simultaneously.(while at the same caressing the thigh of his neighbors wife) singing encouraged but optional.
 
 
Nice, nice  
 
 
I will never forget the thread where you introduced the "chronosynclastic infidubla," dys. (Defined there as "where all things wrong are made right...also upside down.) That was a brilliant piece of writing. It's what got me hooked on A2K.

So...is it spelled "infidubla" or "infudibula"?

(The anarchistic type sounds like even more fun.)
 
 
Eva, I deny everything. I was just coming home late and saw nothing. Speaking of dinner last night, I was only humming Don Giovanni.(hands in my pockets of course)
 
 
Ooooohhhh....my head!

How long have I been asleep? We DEFINITELY had too much wine in that last bistro. Last I remember, Francis opened another bottle and promised us a tour of Paris. And here we all are, lying on the sidewalk in the same clothes we were wearing a month ago...did we actually sleep here?!    

What time is it, anyway? My watch seems to be missing.

What day is it?

Ummm....what month is it?

 

Hmph. Some tour guide that Francis is. Gets us drunk and leaves us in the gutter. He could have at least checked us into a cheap hotel, I think.

Hey! Where's my purse?! OH NO! My passport was in there!
 
 
So Francis left you drunk laying in the gutter and took your
purse? What do you know!  

Thank goodness I took a side trip through the Provence
while you were with Francis on tour.

The first thing you need now Eva is a good drink and
something to eat. Look here is a little Bistro that looks
quite inviting.

 
 
 
Just checkink the best accomodation...

First I want you to take a look on this Avenue...

In the middle right of it, did you nocticed a red spot?

 
 
 
And what is behind the red spot?
 
 
A place, even though well-known, I would like to take you all to!

Fouquet's.

We are arriving :

 
 
 
Oh, that looks very charming and inviting, and most importantly,
the sun is shinning. It would be nice to sit outside.
 
 
Please, do take a seat!

 
 
 
Francis, why is this place so special?
 
 
I took a similar picture in 1994.

 
 
 
CJ - Time to time I stop here to have a drink or lunch. Other than you can see life as it's going, in this place you can meet many celebrities.
Last time (three months ago) I met M. Englund here.

 
 
 
This Englund?  http://www.alibris.com/search/search.cfm?S=R&wauth=Harold+M.+Englund&siteID=PmFI5OlCKw4-VJ_.V6CzFQ.X16nI7IiJhw 
 
 
I've not access to your link but probably not.

Mine is Robert Englund as "Freddy", and Willie in V series.
 
 
That's very interesting Francis, why just last week I was in down town Wolf Hole, Arizona and when I stopped my truck to get a drink of American Southern Mash Whisky I saw, to my surprise, Seldom Seen Smith. We don't get many celebs in Wolf Hole so it durn sure took me aback. As I am sure you know Seldom Seen once played at Albert Hall were he performed "there's a rabbit in the log and I ain't got no dog". well anyway here is the pic I took that memorable day.
 
 
 
Mr. Englund is an actor.
Francis, you should come and stroll around Rodeo Drive
in Beverly Hills, it is full of celebrities.

Oh dys, that looks more like gustav's Avatar.
 
 
So, which of all those seats is considered smart to choose?
 
 
<Sorry, Dys, just trying to entertain people not yet blasé> :wink:
 
 
He's just kidding Francis   We know you're working overtime
to entertain and please us.

ossobuco, the best table would be one in the back, where
passerbys wouldn't look down your plate every second.
 
 
Osso, actually none of those on the sidewalk, they are for tourists.

The better are those by the front door.
 
 
Why?
 
 
You better served!
 
 
take a look inside :

 
 
 
Well, then we sit by the door - I'm the farthest away though.
On second thought, with you as a guide Francis, we should
get superb service, no matter what, right?
 
 
Let's say : good service!
 
 
 
take a look inside :

 
 

Very nice indeed. I love the color red.
 
 
 
<Sorry, Dys, just trying to entertain people not yet blasé> :wink:
 

Francis you silly goose, I worry that you may be taking me seriously. That indicates a potentially fatal flaw in your personality. Are you on any medications?
 
 
Tomorrow I'll show you the menu!
Now I must leave.
 
 
I'm all confused - from the photo by CI, it looks like just outside the buildings is a wide sidewalk, and then an allee' of trees (double rows) with (guessing) masses of tables and chairs between the tree rows (or is that another traffic lane?), and eventually the road and several traffic lanes.

So... are there tables on that wide sidewalk by the buildings?
And if there are, wouldn't people who actually wanted to meet and talk want to be towards the trees?

This is hard to talk about without a pointer...
 
 
I don't know ossobuco, I've never been there.
 
 
osso, Really not so confusing. It's normal to have inside and outside seating. The outside seating is on the sidewalk with umbrellas and some have barriers of some sort.
 
 
Here in Tomball, Texas, we have indoor outdoor seating for everything, not just eating.
 
 
Here in north north Fogville, it's usually a little chilly to be lolling about at outside tables, although there are a few tables dotted about here and there.

I've always loved outdoor cafes.. Los Angeles didn't have all that many of them either, until relatively recently.
 
 
We have great outdoor restaurants and cafes in town, mostly run by Europeans. Some of the outdoor places overlook
the ocean and are just breathtaking.

Ossobuco, but the inside picture looks very cozy and comfortable, maybe we should eat and drink inside the
restaurant  
 
 
I agree, Calamity, we should get together inside the restaurant, it does look cozy. After all, Francis will be taking us walking in several places...

I feel like I've heard of Fouquet's, but I suppose I am remembering the historic Fouquet - wasn't that the name of the fellow with one of those lalapaloosa chateaus?
 
 
I have some friends who are thinking of buying an apartment in Paris; the one they were thinking of bidding on, which I assume fell through since I haven't heard, was completely devastatingly enviable; it is in the Marais district.
(Sigh, I haven't been to Paris. Yet.)
 
 
I haven't been to Paris either Osso, and I think I won't -
aside from a virtual trip - have ever a chance to go.
I've been to the southern coast though many moons ago, to Nice, Cannes and Marseilles.
 
 
Never say never!
 
 
That's true littlek, but there are other places I'd like
to visit when I have (one day) more time available.
Have you been there?
 
 
Never get your mind set on "never." There are too many people in this world that "never" travels - even outside their city limits. Think big; and dream.
 
 
cicerone, I have traveled quite a bit in Europe, Asia, North America, and intent to do so in the future. However, before I visit Paris, I'd like to see other places beforehand.

Of course, should I win the lottery, I will stop working and
have more time to visit all the places in the world  
 
 
I've never been to Paris - or France. I studied french all through school. I'd like to use it somewhere. I have been to Spain, England and Italy. I'd like to visit Ireland and France. But, I'd settle for Quebec.
 
 
And I have to deal with my italophilia - I don't really want to go any place else as much as I want to go there one more time, each time. I don't travel all that much, though I love travelling, and have to watch my choices as I don't have limitless chances.

If prince charming came along and wanted to travel with me and, er, help pay for it, I'd be doing more exploring.
 
 
Couldn't you tag Italy onto a trip to another european nation?
 
 
Yes...
or Boston (I talked to my cousin from Boston tonight...)
Anyway, yes, I do plan to hit Italy with my presence again and hope to meet a2kers either there or somewhere inbetween.

It sounds like I've been to Italy a lot but I just make a lot of noise about it. First time, we landed at JFK and ran ran ran for a plane to Milan.
Second time, we spent two and a half hours, with me sneezing, at Heathrow International's entombed lounge area - I think I sneeze from airport cleaning products.
Third time, I spent about a half hour in Pittsburgh, at a US Air Terminal.

Next time, I plan to stay a bit more time somewhere, whether it is London or wherever. (I've not been to England. Have read about the place, of course.) Hmmm, Dublin... I'd enjoy putting my feet on irish soil. Hmmm, Madrid? Hmmm, Amsterdam?
Or, as I mentioned, Boston, my mother's hometown.

We'll see. Won't be for a while.
 
 
osso, If you plan a sojourn to London, bring lot'sa money, cash, greenbacks, or even GBPs.  
 
 
I don't plan it, exactly, CI, much as I'd love to do it. I'll have to pick one place, which will probably have to do with what is available for flights and if a2kers might be able to meet me wherever. As for money, I travel fairly sparely, with the occasional one-or-two-night at a beloved three star, but mostly one star or off the map type places, small alberghi. I don't eat much and walk a lot. Have been known to go into fancy places for a glass of wine though. I know it's more expensive for us US folk in Europe now, grrrrr, but that's the way the ball bounces.

If it was Boston, I'd stay at least a night with my cousin in Lynnfield, wherever that is, and probably have to ward off cousinlets and plans.
 
 
 
If it was Boston, I'd stay at least a night or two with my cousin in Lynnfield, wherever that is.
 

Nice town, about 15 miles north of Boston (not far from beautiful
downtown Stoneham).
Let us locals know if you come.
 
 
A very good friend of mine lives in Needham. Why do they all have "ham" at the endig?
 
 
Need + Ham = Needham. Is it sheep country?
 
 
need ham goes with ded ham.
 
 
I will, George. My mother was born in Watertown, which I've been to as a child. Other family lived in Malden; I've also been there, for the cousin I mentioned's wedding back in the early fifties (I was supposed to be a flower girl but they didn't let me, quite a relief.) My grandmother was from South Boston.

I took my mother back to Boston for a visit after my father died, in '68, and that was a tormenting trip, my first clue she was coming down with dementia, a word I didn't really know then. Did I rent a car? I think so. I think I got us on some
big road and got us over to Watertown to see the old homestead on Green Street and the one on Mt. Auburn, and then took us to Harvard Square, for me - I was interested in Harvard Square, and then back to the motel, where she didn't want to go meet her friend but I cudjelled her to, a lame meeting of lifelong friends. I had no clue what was wrong, why my mother was acting peculiarly.

Then we went to NYC by Greyhound, as we also used to live there, and it was the same, she was confused and distressed.

She did die of Alzheimer's, in the late seventies, and I hadn't been back to these places myself. Did go to NYC two years ago with much enthusiasm and fun, and would like to do Boston for some of the same complex reasons, though I remember it less from my own life. Mostly I remember good fried clams in Essex.
 
 
Is ham pronounced ham or hmm?

hnh?
 
 
Is it Needhum as pronounced, or Need ham?
 
 
Need'm will suffice - I think.
 
 
Ah, I guessed as much'm.
 
 
Cic is correct.
 
 
Yeah, it's Need'm and a dry town on top of it  
Need less to say, I haven't visited Need ham
yet.
 
 
After our trip to Europe, Dys and I want to go to OZ and harrass dlowan, Margo and msolga. Sometime next year.

Francis, I think you'll be surprised that Dys (Bob) is a wonderful combination of very nice and a rather strange. His sense of humor is one of the things that first attracted me to him, as well as his philosophy.

I love your very Frenchness and smile at the comparison with Dys and his very Dysness. He somtimes serenades me with that old country western song,
 
Drip Kick Me Jesus, Through the Goal Posts of Life
 
. Ah, romance...

In addition to being drop kicked, I also love Yves Montand and Gerard Depardieu and Simone Signoret.
 
 
I'm a Depardieu fan too, Diane, understand liking Signoret, like Montand, ooooh, in Z, and, well, don't get me started.
I think honing in on the Aussies is an excellent idea. They have felt forlorn yet energized by their island in the world thing, and need repeated visits to set them right, whatever right turns out to be.
 
 
Well, there you are, Francis! Fouquet's...ah, very nice! Remind me, please...the name of the avenue? (Checking my memory. I was there in 2002.)

After a month passed out in the gutter, I've freshened up now and put on my best Chanel scarf. I've had quite enough of sitting outside for the time being...I believe I'll sit over here at this table with Osso and CJ if there's room for another person?

What shall we order? No, please, no more wine just yet....
 
 
I believe, Francis wanted to show us the menue someday
soon  

I just had breakfast, so I can wait.
 
 
Well, Eva, this avenue, which leads to Arc of Triumph, is named : Champs Elysées.
<Elysian Fields, in Greek mythology, the abode of the blessed>

 
 
 
 
I'm all confused - from the photo by CI, it looks like just outside the buildings is a wide sidewalk, and then an allee' of trees (double rows) with (guessing) masses of tables and chairs between the tree rows (or is that another traffic lane?), and eventually the road and several traffic lanes.

So... are there tables on that wide sidewalk by the buildings?
And if there are, wouldn't people who actually wanted to meet and talk want to be towards the trees?

This is hard to talk about without a pointer...
 

I think this picture explains. Double row of trees on the sidewalk, tables and chairs between the trees and in front of the buildings.

 
 
 
Francis, everything looks so old there, I bet Paris is a good place to find antiques.
 
 
That I can tell you! I dont know how there are yet things here, with all the americans buy each year!
If you came to Paris I can show you places for find antiques.
 
 
Thanks, Francis, I understand better now.
 
 
 
Well, Eva, this avenue, which leads to Arc of Triumph, is named : Champs Elysées.
<Elysian Fields, in Greek mythology, the abode of the blessed>

 
 

AHA! I thought so! Then it must have been Fouquet's where we stopped for a quick lunch one day. I remembered the red awnings and the initial "F" but didn't remember the whole name. I think I stood on the same median to take my picture of the Arc, too. Didn't bother going up to the top of it...after having enjoyed the view from the Eiffel Tower, I wasn't interested. Will have to go see if I can find my picture of the Arc so we can compare...
 
 
And from the Fouquet's, at the corner of Champs and Av. George V, you can see this :

 
 
 
WOW...when did that go up, Francis?! It must have caused quite a sensation!

Here's a link to my Arc photo (and other Paris photos) at Raven's Realm. I can't figure out how to upload it to A2K from there since it doesn't have a "jpg" or other appropriate file extension on that site. Just click on "Next" until you come to the Arc shot.

 http://groups.msn.com/TheRavensRealm/evasphotos.msnw?action=ShowPhoto&PhotoID=8011 
 
 
This is your picture.

 
 
 
Eva, the picture is from french luxury brand : Vuitton. It's there for at least a year and people dont stop taking pictures!
 
 
I don't like the Louis Vuitton Advertisement.
The house behind it has so much more to offer - from an
architectural point of view.

And I actually could use a glass of redwine <darn meetings, sigh>
 
 
Jo, true about the Aussies. Downunder is something of an insult to them, considering it an arbitrary term, which it is, I guess. The Aussies on a2k are not to be missed, as far as Dys and I are concerned.

Eva, your Paris pictures are so beautiful. I would love to see Paris and the rest of France. So much traveling to do, so little time.

Francis, we do love antiques, but our house is too little for anymore purchases. A tour with you would suffice beautifully.

CJ, a little wine sounds perfect right now. You pick.
 
 
Okay Diane, then lets open a bottle of Mount Eden Pinot Noir, Estate, 2000.

 

Cheers Diane!
 
 
Pour one for me too, CJ! <Cheers!>

Yes, I recognized the storefront display as an oversized LV trunk and purse. I can well imagine how people keep taking pictures of it! I wonder how long they plan to keep it up?

Thanks for the kudos on the pictures, Diane. I have lots more...those are just a few of my favorites. I fell in love with Sainte Chappelle...have a whole album just from there. The first photo on that link, of the Eiffel Tower, carousel and ice cream (glace) stand at night, is probably the best photo of the bunch. I took it with my back against the stone wall that borders the Seine with music from the dinner boats going down the river behind me. Too bad you can't capture sound in a photo. At any rate, that shot captured the moment for me. I have it enlarged and framed in my office.
 
 
 
I fell in love with Sainte Chappelle...
 

Let's take a look...

 
 
 
Oh, Francis! Wherever did you find such a wonderful shot?! There's so much light! (All my photos came out darker than this one.)

For those who don't know about this chapel, it was the private chapel of French royalty at the palace in Paris. It is considered by many to be the most exquisite church in France. The ceiling is dark blue with gold stars to represent heaven, and the chapel's walls on three sides are almost entirely stained glass, separated only by sky-high, pencil-thin columns. It's an incredible architectural feat. The picture above shows the back wall with its incredible rose window and the doors where the kings and queens (right up to Louis XVI and Marie Antoinette) entered.

I just stood inside those doors and stared and stared for what seemed like hours. It was unbelievably beautiful. See that small square-shaped latch on the doors, just above the heads of the crowd? As I turned to go, I looked up at that latch and found that it consisted of two cherubs gazing up at the same wonders I had just seen, with the same expression of wonder on their faces that I knew was on mine. I took a photo of the cherubs (slightly damaged from the Revolution) and it is still one of my favorites. I considered them kindred spirits. We just stood there together in awe. I uploaded that picture to the same link I posted above...it's on Page 2 of my album.

 http://groups.msn.com/TheRavensRealm/evasphotos.msnw?action=ShowPhoto&PhotoID=8033 

Thank you, thank you, thank you, Francis! If you have more, I'd love to see them! <BIG smooch>
 
 
Eva bella, the first time I clicked on your link to the tower photo, I failed to catch on to looking further at your other photos. You have a good eye for a scene, girl.

I remember the Bellagio one from the a2k gallery... it's still a winner.
 
 
Thank you, osso! Those are just personal travel shots, but I have taken & art directed photos for publication for years.

On with the tour, Francis! Where shall we go next?
 
 
Remember we are at Fouquet's...

Let's see the menu

- Lobster ravioli style served with shellfish emulsion

- Scallop prepared in muscat sauce, duck foie gras cannelloni, cauliflower and cress

- Viande

Double veal chop prepared in a casserole dish, potatoes and mushrooms

- Fromage

Selection of ripened cheeses of Maître Quatrehomme

Caramel cake, lemon chiboust, peef juice
 
 
Good idea Francis, I'm vamished.

Lets start with the caramel cake.....
 
 
The caramel cake does sound scrumptious, but I cannot pass up the lobster ravioli! And OMG, look at those cheeses! You can't get cheese like that in the U.S. What a shame.
 
 
Yes you can Eva! Just have to have a french restaurant/ gourmet shop in your town. We do!
 
 
We have one nearby, but they only get a few cheeses and not the ones I remembered.  

Besides, I'm sure they taste better at Fouquet's anyway. They must.
 
 
What are viandes?

In the meantime I'll have the ravioli and the scallop dish, please. I am thinking I need a nice white to sip...
 
 
Tonight, I think I'll pour myself a glass of white wine
too osso. I had a rough day, this will be perfect to unwind.

Eva, move to southern California. A lot of Europeans
live here and they own fabulous gourmet stores where
you can buy whatever your heart (or stomach rather)
desires  
 
 
That is certainly true. We had, and may still have for all I know, in Venice, on West Washington, recently known as Abbot Kinney Boulevard, the French Market. Truth to tell, it wasn't all that great, but I liked the owners, whose names I now don't remember, and the ambiance, such as it was.
Basically, jams and coffee and nice people. Bicyclers stopped, and there were tables with umbrellas. Plus bamboo, which I warned them would take over. It was running bamboo planted near asphalt.

I suppose it is fine, and wish them well.

Then, since I left, but I've been informed, Massimiliano's Delectables came in behind Van's Sneakers on Redwood, a block north of my office. Now there was a bakery. On one of my visits back, Nancy (my landscape architect artist friend who makes her own ketchup, according to my niece) spirited me over there and we picked a swath of things and tried them with her husband Don, who arrived home after his bikeride.

This is poignant in retrospect as he died a couple of years ago, young and gaining in art fame, and past that just gaining, and she has been reeling and adjusting.

So.... that day with those particular delectables were special in our lives, as pals.
 
 
One more picture of Sainte Chapelle, before the cheese!
 
 
 
Aaaahhhhhhh..........

<closing my eyes and remembering>
 
 
So, let's see the cheese :

 
 
 
May I add my mumbling remark that there are just two cheeses I really like? (I've never been in Sainte Chapelle: there are better examples without having to queue up and pay an entrance fee.)
 
 
B-b-but...isn't Germany known for its cheeses as well? Which two cheeses do you like, Walter?

I'll have a little taste of each of the above, Francis. With un petit vin blanc, if you don't mind. (Please excuse the bad French if that wasn't correct.)
 
 
The Camembert (but only, if it's a real [raw milk] one) and the Petit Basque.
 
 
Oh, I would enjoy some of the others as well - but they aren't my 'first choice'. :wink:

German cheeses are mostly all 'factory made'.
And instead of buying some good 'cover versions' from small (German) organic producers, I prefer the originals  
 
 
At Fouquet's the Camembert is a real one.

I must add that Cantal (up left), I find delicious.
 
 
Oh Eva, the German cheeses stink terribly. One brand "Limburger" you only can eat outside otherwise you'll faint.

I guess it's too early for me to eat cheese - besides
I have to play soccer soon   Kids against parents <sigh>
 
 
Cantal and similar belonged to last year's favourites - changed my preferred cheeses completely, whch still confuses the shop assistant  
 
 
Now, I'm hungry! I'd like to have some baked Camembert
with red currants and a pear on the side.
 
 
A raped camembert, so to say :wink:
 
 
What do you mean by that Walter?
 
 
Well, to heat a camembert...
 
 
Your currants my lady!

 
 
 
Great service! Thank you Francis  

Walter, one shouldn't? But I like it heated, a lot.....  
 
 
I like it (use only cheap camembert, however), but one really shouldn't.
 
 
 
...Eva, move to southern California....
 

I did that once. I prefer it here, even if I do have to travel to get good French cheeses. I love Camembert, too...and the one I had in Paris was delicious. They served it with a baguette and fresh cherries, as I remember. (Hmmm...heated...must try that. Sounds similar to baked brie.)
 
 
Ready to walk down the Champs, now?
 
 
Yes, try it Eva, the Camembert is breaded though and
deep fried.

Now you two go off walking down the Champs, I'll
explore someplace else  
 
 
From an American  website  about German food (sic!)

 
 
Camembert
Similar to Brie, Camembert's flavor is a bit more mild and less sweet. When deep fried in beer batter, it makes a tempting snack and hors d'oeuvre
 
 
 
'mericuns are far more particular about cheese (especially Okla-damn-homans)
 
 
 
Haha dys  

I haven't stooped that low yet, and actually never tried
Cheez-Whiz, but I'm sure it's good for some taste buds.
 
 
At least Cheez Whiz beats Dys's favorite...

 
 
 
     

Just noticed how funny my sig looks with that last post.
 
 
damn girl, if I was still allowed to drive I would come to OklaDamnhoma and slap you silly!
 
 
You're not allowed to drive?
 
 
well yeah I can drive but the lady Diane won't allow me out after dark.
 
 
Well then, it's a good thing Francis got this limo for us.

Now that we've finished our luncheon, where are we going next?
 
 
I'm always good for a little nap after lunch and before
an epresso.
 
 
Coffee, my ladies!

 
 
 
Definitely! I'm sitting here in my office half asleep....zzzZZzzzz
 
 
let's go...

Please, take places, ladies and gentlemen...

 
 
 
Where are you taking us too?
 
 
Not too far, I'd like to show you this place, Le Grand Palais.

Osso would like to go!

 
 
 
Oh beautiful architecture with the glass roof, but unfortunately it looks grey and rainy
just like here...

What are we going to see inside?
 
 
Calm down, CJ! we have all our time (at least, me).

Let's see the entry...

 
 
 
I am calm, tstststs.....

Okay, I will be well behaved now and let you lead us
the way, without pushing....  
 
 
Oh! Oh! I missed this when I was in Paris! If I remember correctly, it was built for a World's Fair or something similar, right? And now it is an important art gallery?
 
 
It's part of French museums. Exhibitions continuously take place :

 here the next 
 
 
We are going to see that in London.... besides one paiting, the most famous, which the "frogs"   didn't send there :wink:
 
 
oooh la la!
 
 
pursuing our periple we head to Musée d'Orsay...

 
 
 
But first we must cross Alexander III bridge..

 
 
 
and the Orsay museum..

 
 
 
Francis -- You must tell me, who is this Alexander III that the bridge is named for? I asked this question when I was there, but nobody knew.

The Musee d'Orsay! Oh boy! That was the first time I ever saw any Henri Rousseaus in person. I believe they had two. And they also had a great collection of Rodins. Since I didn't have time to make the Rodin museum, this was the next best thing.
 
 
Alexandre III Aleksandrovitch (1845-1894), Czar of Russia (1881-1894), grand grand-son of Catherine II the Great.
(Remember she was a friend of Rousseau and Voltaire).
 
 
 History of the Pont Alexandre III 
 
 
Good, Walter!

Tomorrow we'll cross the Seine again and visit Rodin Museum.
 
 
Ah, some nakeds.
 
 
Are you PC on that topic, Walter? :wink:
 
 
At least, you didn't suggest us exploring the rues around the Boulevard de Clichy tonight :wink:
 
 
Not with our charming company  
 
 
They might be interested, who knows?  
 
 
I doubt, Walter...
 
 
I see you've had a nice sightseeing tour. I'll join in tomorrow, provided I get some good pastries somewhere
along the way......
 
 
And I will too, if someone promises to mention Camille Claudel...

Francis, I have only seen the Museum d'Orsay in virtual photos quite a while ago, but it attracts me greatly. Do you like it yourself, or have qualms in any regard?

I'm tough, y'know, as a lady on a tour. Well, I trust your exquisite judgement.
 
 
Uh oh, what I just said could be taken in a censoring way, which is not what I meant.
 
 
I saw a couple of sculptures by Camille Claudel at the Orsay, osso. Fascinating story, hers....
 
 
Oh look, CJ! It's the Maison Stohrer!

 

Wonderful pastries here. It doesn't get any better than this. Would you care to share a Paris-Brest, or would you prefer to order your own? I believe I'll have cafe au lait with mine.

Now, if only we could find a nice park bench or table and chairs....<looking around>
 
 
 
 
 
I actually have this mini-poster framed in my kitchen. Brought it back from Paris.

 
 
 
Eva, no fair, but if you insist, I'll have a little bit of each.

Walter and Francis, you both were so secretive that I had to check out Boulevard de Clichy. Hmmpf, the Moulin Rouge has turned into an expensive tourist trap and the rest of the area is simply seedy, from what I read. Francis was right, the ladies will decline.

A trip to Paris has been a dream for so long; now, with Francis working his magic with photos and beautiful tours, it is something I must do.

One of the characteristics of France that I have always admired is the vital interest in individuality and quality and hmmm, charm, taste, wit? So many components. Here is a clip from an article about the uniqueness of France:

 
France is essentially a country that celebrates, preserves, and encourages diversity in all its disorderly, gloriously stimulating tangle.

This pervasive quality of diversity is why those of us who love to visit France, do. It is the sense of discovery and delight that comes with exploring the richly diverse fabric of life here. Walk the streets of Paris. What do you notice? I notice all the tiny storefronts, selling who knows what...feminine accessories, Basque foods, items made from snakeskin, molds of people's hands... I'm sure I'll never live long enough to discover all that Paris has to offer. Not even long enough to visit all its bookstores! In fact, the only bookstore chains I've seen here are the Brentano's and WH Smith catering to the English-language crowds.
 
I apologize for not having the author's name--I'll try to find it in order to give her credit for the lovely writing.

Nearing bedtime, I'll have a little Chambord, if you please. This, to me, is magic.
 
 
Thank you Eva, I was looking for something sweet to eat
after dinner. You're quite brave to have such a poster
hanging in your kitchen. I would gain 10 lbs. just looking
at it. I can do away with anything, except sweets. <sigh>

That Patisserie looks very inviting  

Good night Diane, enjoy your nightcap.
 
 
Diane, are you still awake, you naughty girl? A little bit of each????
 
 
Hi osso--just about to call it a night. My dream restaurant dessert would be a tray with bite size pieces of one's choice; that way, saying, "One of each, please," wouldn't put me in the hospital.
(But then, you've seen the way I eat chocolates, hee, hee.)
 
 
To explain and let others in to the chocolate ward,
I just visited Dys and Diane in Albuquerque, a week or so ago.

When I arrived, I brought with me a box of Sjaak's Chocolates with Diane in mind, as we had gone into a chocolate store in NY together in the distant past, maybe 2003. We were good then. I requested two, and she three (osso says passive aggressively), and we ate them almost before we walked to meet Roberta at a restaurant. We didn't know each other that well and were on good behavior. My chocolates were so good I left my newish umbrella in the chocolate store in the Plaza Hotel. So it goes.

So there I was visiting in Albuquerque and there is Diane with her chocolates. I tried not to take one, I had gotten one when I picked them out at the store in the first place. Waved them away, heh.

So, next morning I look at the box in consideration and there are all these half-chocolates, naked, cream fillings flowing out into the brown wraps...

Pitiful, really.

I had to rescue a few.
 
 
I saw only the empty wrappers.
 
 
Phew!!! <sweat dripping down my face>. Hi everyone :-D I'll have beer and a shot of something strong. Make it a double.
 
 
So Dys, I heard about you, Cheez Whiz and Paris somewhere. Is it really true?
 
 
montana, you herd sheep!
 
 
Montana, you are welcome here  

Let's celebrate it with a glass of champagne!
(As I think you had tough times) :wink:

 
 
 
You're finally here! Here's the beer I promised you, and a little company to spare.

 

See? I told 'em you were coming. :wink:
 
 
And what's this thingie doing there?  

 
 
 
 
And I will too, if someone promises to mention Camille Claudel...

Francis, I have only seen the Museum d'Orsay in virtual photos quite a while ago, but it attracts me greatly. Do you like it yourself, or have qualms in any regard?

I'm tough, y'know, as a lady on a tour. Well, I trust your exquisite judgement.
 

Being myself quite aware of the works of Rodin and Camille Claudel, I promise you to mention her more than twice  

Paris have many museums Orsay being one of them and it worth the visit.
One must choose the time to visit it when exhibitions fits your tastes.
I've no qualms about it.
As in many others places in Paris I love it's architecture.

Check this link  for exihibitions going on 
 
 
Eva - La Maison Stohrer is one of the best "pâtisseries" of Paris.
Unfortunately, it has no tables and chairs. That's why I advice we going next time to Dalloyau or Ladurée which have tearooms, and where pastries are also wonderful.Btw, Ladurée is not far from Fouquet's.

A little bit of history : When the princess of Poland, Maria Leczinska came to France to marry the King Louis XV, she asked her father King Stanislas, to take Mr Stohrer, court "patissier" to Paris. Few years later, he created his business, still in the family today.

Stohrer has created Baba au Rhum and some think you can by the best in Paris there.

 

Btw, I prefer Paris-Brest  
 
 
 
Nearing bedtime, I'll have a little Chambord, if you please. This, to me, is magic.
 

Diane - It's my pleasure to grant you a vow :

 

and one more :

 
 
 
France's Rothenburg :wink:
 
 
Having seen Musée d'Orsay, let's head to Musée Rodin...

 
 
 
And here it is :

 
 
 
Let me show you my favorite :

 
 
 
Oho, I just came at the right time  
 
 
I SAY!! Too saucy for me in here......I've come over all historical.
I'm off.
Ellpus.
 
 
Do you prefer this one by Camille Claudel?

 
 
 
Haha Lord Ellpus, please stay. Francis' could use a few
male counterparts in his harem  
 
 
They're both breathtaking Francis (in more ways than one),
and it's still lunch here...<sigh>
 
 
Lord Ellpus! Wait! Please don't go!

This is Art...we're enjoying a tour of the Rodin Museum in Paris, that's all. If the nudes offend you, please just wait on the park bench outside the entrance. We'll be finished soon, then I'll treat you to a nice cup of tea somewhere nearby. Okay?

Meanwhile...look what I found, Francis! Seems Rodin did a statue of me!

"Eva" -- Auguste Rodin, Musee' Rodin, Paris
 
 
 
Sorry, time coming to disappear :wink:
 
 
I think Lord Ellpus is just thinking of the unemployed, whose
hand he's been shaking.  
 
 
Eva - Seems he didn't make a good work, you are way more beautiful!
 
 
Why thank you, kind sir! But I have learned to be tolerant...so many artists have done portraits of me through the years. Very few have gotten it right. I'm afraid poor Rodin didn't have the patience to finish his version.
 
 
Thats better.....found a bijou little Pissoir on La Rue St Jacques, and only just in time I'd say, I was absolutely gagging for a pee...now, Ou sommes nous? Ah Oui, L'art.
Is there a bar in here perchance?

Hello?.....Bonjour? Etes vous la?
 
 
"Hello?....HELLO? Looks like I'm on my own."

<walks about a bit, hands in pockets>

"Now, what do we have here...Rodin eh? Got one of those.......Claudel, Vachement Joli !!..had two of those until Freddy Perkins knocked the head off one.........Ah, a Monet...must be a fake, I have the real one in the main banquet room,....Wait a minute...who's turned the lights out?"

<stumble fumble CRASH....tinkle tinkle...........silence >

"Act casual Ellpus....nobody will even realise you've been in here....hope they're insured."

<feels his way to exit door.....CREEEEAK.....SLAM >
 
 
Dys
How did you know?

Francis
That champagne is mouth watering. Thanks so much you sweet thing ;-)

Eva
Thanks sweetie. I needed that and it looks like I'm just in time, as the place is packed with handsome men :-D

Cheers everone :-D

Now it's back to painting my bathroom, so I'll be back.
 
 
Well Lord Ellpus, we're all working on different time
schedules here, or rather different time zones. Be patient with us  

I still enjoy reading you!
 
 
Eva, I love Rodin's Eva, ner mind how it might not fit you exactly.

Francis, thank you for all this..

Lord, won't you buy me a Mercedes Benz?
 
 
So, I see the Good Lord has decided to join us after all.

Uh oh. Here come the police in their jaunty little uniforms. They're looking for the culprit who knocked over the Gates of Hell. Seems there's a trail of large feathers leading to a pissoir on the corner. Ellpus must be wearing his ostrich get-up again. Won't the police be surprised when they open the door! "Abandon hope, all ye who enter here"    

(Hint:  http://www.able2know.com/forums/viewtopic.php?t=47414&postdays=0&postorder=asc&start=0  )
 
 
Ah well, it seems Lord Ellpus has once again vanished without a trace.

Back to the tour, Francis? Where shall we go after the magnificent Rodins? There is so much to see!
 
 
It seems to me that Francis is slowly displacing me from the hearts and minds of the lovely ladies on A2K.

Damn, I have competetion.

Can I pls have a stiff rye and soda with ice, while I contemplate my next move.
 
 
Are you back at home in London, dear Prince? We have missed you. <smooch>
 
 
<Prince notes that eva did not deny the rumor abt Francis>

Yeah, am back, but only for a week - travelling again next Sat.
 
 
<Prince - who am I to replace such a majesty at the very heart of our company?>

I dont think you have something to fear from a commoner like me! :wink:
 
 
In the history of monarchy, it is always the common man who has led a revolution to throw the ruling class.

I have much to fear
 
 
Your drink, my lord...

 

and I'll talk one with you...

 

Cheers!
 
 
No special reason, but'Im suddenly remembering the old Scottish saying: there are two things Scotsmen like naked, and one of them is their whisky.

(Oh, it was rye.)
 
 
Prince, women can handle more than one man
quite easily. In fact, every women should be allowed to keep
two men at all times, for various different purposes,
of course   So there is definitely room for you.

Please someone take me to a place where there is sun.
We're on withdrawal out here in shallow, superficial
California.
 
 
 
Please someone take me to a place where there is sun.
We're on withdrawal out here in shallow, superficial
California.
 

 

:wink:
 
 
Oh Walter, I'm getting homesick <sigh>
What is all the white stuff on the "Rathaus".
 
 
 
What is all the white stuff on the "Rathaus".
 

From the wires of your news-on-demand-(anti-)homesick-service:

 
Nachdem bereits im Sommer 2004 ein erster Abschnitt der Rathausfassade saniert wurde, folgt seit Dienstag, 22. Februar, der zweite Sanierungsabschnitt. Die im vergangenen Jahr durchgeführte Fassadenprüfung ergab, dass auch an der Seite zum Marienplatz zwischen Turm und Ecke Dienerstraße Fassadenteile saniert werden müssen.
 
 
 
Ah thank you Walter for the info. I hope they're finished until June, when I'll arrive  

Sorry France lovers, Walter and I took a side trip
to Munich.
 
 
 
I hope they're finished until June, when I'll arrive  

 

I'll do all what is possible, but unfortunately:

 
Nach Abschluss der Bauarbeiten im Juli 2005 wird das Gerüst wieder abgebaut.
 
 
 
  Okay, it's not that I haven't memorized it already... I have huge posters of the "Marienplatz" hanging
in my house.
 
 
Darn it! THe child is getting late for school........
 
 
That remembers me the many times I've been there!
 
 
Jacques? Something red, not too sweet, with a splash of cyanide. Thanks, love.
 
 
 
Your drink, my lord...

 

and I'll talk one with you...

 

Cheers!
 

I have to get my personal taster to taste this first.....
 
 
I've made it at least to the office!

Gosh, you're all drinking and here it's barely 9 am.
Francis, when was the last time you visited Munich?
 
 
CJ- first time was 1983 then some other times.

From 1990 to 1997, I were at the opening of Oktober Fest.

Since then I've not been in München, but I'm in Germany at least three times a year.

Last time was in November, before that was September and before was June...

I'll be in Germany again in May 28.
 
 
Oh yes the Oktoberfest has become quite the attraction
in recent years. In ancient times, when I was a child,
it was more for the locals - now it is more for the tourists.

May 28? Oh, for the ak2 gathering. Unfortunately, I'll
arrive only in June, otherwise I would have liked to meet
all of you.
 
 
I'm so sorry CJ that you will miss the opportunity to meet me, I am very interesting.
 
 
I know that dys   I've come to enjoy your dry humor,
and I bet it is even more present in person.
 
 
... but none of the European meetings is on May 28, though (four weeks earlier it is).

I'm here, in Germany, btw Francis, on May 28 as well!
 
 
Walter, depending on my agenda, I'll phone you...
 
 
Yes Walter, but Lippstadt is too far to travel.....
 
 
You are welcome - Bienvenu ! :wink:
 
 
 
I know that dys   I've come to enjoy your dry humor,
and I bet it is even more present in person.
 

Actually in person I'm an arrogant sarcastic bore, yet still interesting.
 
 
 
Jacques? Something red, not too sweet, with a splash of cyanide. Thanks, love.
 

What is all this talk of cyanide on such a lovely morning in Paris, Cinn? The sun is shining, the Prince is back, and we're going antiques shopping! Dys can talk to the salespeople about the Ottoman Empire again.

Let's try that shop over there. It looks promising...

 
 
 
While you can do your shopping upstairs, I'll wait here

 
 
 
Walter, what a delightful cynicism... :wink:
 
 
Eva - Let's try this one...

 
 
 
Actually, that is one of the cafés in Paris, I really like best - and since it's not so easy to be found, you mostly get a seat there :wink:
 
 
Well, I'd like to try those shops (shops!) - and I'd also like to go with Walter to that cafe...

<clumsy woman knocking over lamps with her scarf>
 
 
Osso, I didn't know you could be so ubiquitous  
 
 
Well, Eva...if you insist! I wouldn't mind acquiring something faceted and sparkling, something that catches the light and scatters it in all directions.

Forget the cyanide; maybe just a spot of benzodiazepine.
 
 
Look, Cinn...here's a shop that might just fill the bill.

 
 
 
I'll have to try these on...

 

 

 

 

 
 
 
Not sure what the second one actually is, but it looks and feels like 22K gold, possibly 24K.
 
 
I like the amethyst in the Deco setting, myself.
 
 
 

Ooh! Those marvelous tables have given me an idea, Francis. We could really use a console table just inside the entrance back at the Wine Cellar. You know, a place to display some fresh flowers and a wine list...? Perhaps with a Venetian mirror on the wall over it? What a wonderful souvenir of our Paris trip that would be!

You guys go on ahead without me for a while. I'm going to stay here for a bit and see if I can find just the right table. They have so many to choose from, and I happen to have a measuring tape right here in my purse. I'll call Sophie back at the Wine Cellar and make sure of the size we need. It may take some time to negotiate a good price...the proprietors here seem to have them marked up higher than usual. And of course, if we do come to an agreement, I will have to make shipping arrangements. So go on ahead, okay? Francis, you lead the way......

Note: It is Spring Break, and we are leaving in the morning for a trip to Galveston, TX. It isn't Paris, but a few days at the seashore sounds absolutely lovely right now. We'll be back for Easter and I'll catch up with you all then......Love, Eva
 
 
Eva finds osso upstairs in the antique store pawing through old etchings..
 
 
"DOWN DOG!" Those old etchings are mine, and I'll scratch them myself if you dont mind!
 
 
Drypoint, no doubt...
 
 
Hi, Eva, it's "cool" here  
 
 
 
 
 
Does anybody here know about Yellow Tail (Australia) wines? I bought two bottles of Chardonay and two bottles of Shiraz - all four bottles for $16 on sale at Longs. I read some reports on these wines on the net, but wondered if anybody had first hand experience with these wines?
 
 
Hello, everyone! I'm back from the beach with just a very slight sunburn...it's nothing, really. More like a "sunkiss."

Yes, it is very cool here in Paris. I found the most delightful bombe chest in the back room of that shop. It had been forgotten for years, so they gave me a very good price on it. I crated it myself and had it shipped back to the Wine Cellar where it will greet us when we return.

Does anyone know about the Yellow Tail wines that c.i. has brought? I do hope he plans to share...

It's so nice to see everyone here again. I missed you all.
 
 
AHEM.....

I SAID "I missed you all."

And I'm still missing you!

Where is everybody?
 
 
The rain began early this morning, first as an earnest mist drifting through the streets and alleys, then with the daylight rising and stretching itself over the city, it started to fall in sheets and splashs, gushes and waves, spills as from washtubs and watering troughs. The water flowed down the gutters to the street corners and subway riders emerging from the city's cellars were forced to decide on wading or leaping or simply tromping across the little oceans. The wind picked up and as the storm's fury slanted into our faces we thought "Gosh, I wonder if Eva has gotten back from the beach yet"....

Joe(Here. Let me rub some of this on that sunburn of yours>)Nation
 
 
 
Does anybody here know about Yellow Tail (Australia) wines? I bought two bottles of Chardonay and two bottles of Shiraz - all four bottles for $16 on sale at Longs. I read some reports on these wines on the net, but wondered if anybody had first hand experience with these wines?
 

Yes c.i. I found the chardonnay slightly oily in taste so I'll be interested to see how you find it. The shiraz was better. I'm no expert but I live in South Australia which is a big wine area in Australia and we export quite a bit to North America.
 
 
good, I have the Shiraz sitting on the dining room table, and ready to open to taste-test. Most stores in the states sell the Yellow Tail wines at $7.99 or $8.99. After I read an article on Yellow Tail, I thought it was worth the gamble to spend $16.00 for four bottles. I'll open the Shiraz tonite, and report back tomorrow on what I think about this wine. When I visited Australia many years ago, we enjoyed the Australian wine with many of our dinners. I thought all the ones served in the restaurants were above average.
 
 
I would LOVE a glass of wine right about now!

I am so, so, so tired. Eva, you are an angel and I thank you for the libations!
 
 
 
good, I have the Shiraz sitting on the dining room table, and ready to open to taste-test. Most stores in the states sell the Yellow Tail wines at $7.99 or $8.99. After I read an article on Yellow Tail, I thought it was worth the gamble to spend $16.00 for four bottles. I'll open the Shiraz tonite, and report back tomorrow on what I think about this wine. When I visited Australia many years ago, we enjoyed the Australian wine with many of our dinners. I thought all the ones served in the restaurants were above average.
 

c.i.,

I have had the Yellow Tail Shiraz and enjoyed it quite a bit. I always lean more towards the reds than the whites. They just seem to suit me better.
If I get really desperate after I move from Sonoma County to Oklahoma, could I talk you into shipping me a good mixed case now and then? Or I suppose I could just go online and order...but it seems to taste better when someone has actually picked it out for you, you know? And I have yet to find anything that you don't have good taste in.  

<very subtle schmoooooze......> :wink:
 
 
I'll pour you one, Lady J  

 
 
 
My brother is the family expert on wine. He loves Yellow Tail Shiraz (Here in the East, it's more like $11.00 a bottle.)

 
If I get really desperate after I move from Sonoma County to Oklahoma, could I talk you into shipping me a good mixed case now and then?
 
You're moving TO Oklahoma?

Joe( A vino, yo entiendo nada, Bourbon por favor)Nation
 
 
Take a glass with us Joe?

Fran(quédate con nosotros, lo entenderás)cis.
 
 
In the interests of research I tried the Yellowtail merlot this evening at a meeting I attended. Pretty good although perhaps just a little bit dry and lacking slightly in fruit. However when a bottle costs under $10 (the local magic number) why would I complain?
 
 
Despite Joe's snide remarks, I will nonetheless serve him bourbon as requested. After all, here at Eva's, we want everyone to be happy.

Here's a good supply I found along Route 66, Joe. Not far from your old stomping grounds. Hope it reminds you of good times there.

 
 
 
I usually like Rosemount (sp?) Shiraz, an australian import often found at Costco, I gather. I cut out going to Costco, so I'm not sure of that any more. I've bought Yellow Tail chard for the label, yes, it's true, I like good looking labels, but found it unmemorable, not awful, but naught to buy again.

On the other hand, I am more of a fume blanc/sauvingnon blanc fan, although I like some chards like Acacia, which is pricier.
 
 
I'm glad I'm not the only one who will admit to buying wines for their labels. Having started out as a graphic designer, I suppose it's a hazard of the trade.

I'll take a glass of the sauvignon blanc you're having, osso.
 
 
Ah, I found another font of serenity and friendship her at Eva's. Thanks for reminding me, Eva. When I travel I sometimes take awhile to find my way back to my favorite haunts. Also, count me in with those of you who find that the wine label can someimes overcome the purchase price.

Some sauvignon blanc sounds loverly. Tonight, maybe some champagne. Hic....
 
 
How nice! Everyone is back from their travels. Good to have
you back Eva and Diane  

For me, some hot tea with honey will do. I feel something
coming on.... My head is pounding and I have a haircut
appointment in an hour. <sigh>

cicerone, you're moving to Oklahoma? Why?
Aehm, not that Oklahoma is not desirable Eva, but moving
from California to Oklahoma isn't a move for a better
climate or scenery.  
 
 
CJ, good to see you again! It is Lady J who is moving to Oklahoma. The area where Eva lives, around Tulsa, is quite lovely; yes, it is not California, but she won't have to worry about earthquakes or being fondled by Ahnold.
 
 
Actually, CJ, we have lovely scenery here in Eastern Oklahoma. Green, rolling hills, forests, flowers and lots of lakes. And four distinct seasons. The state isn't overpopulated or overpolluted, and it's very easy to travel anywhere from here since we're centrally located. We love it. I hope that you will, too, Lady J.

In my experience, one can find culture and sophistication almost anywhere if one looks. As my father always said, "Water seeks its own level."

I know you didn't mean to disparage my home state, CJ, so here's a nice cup of hot tea with honey for you. I hope your head feels better soon.

 
 
 
Haha Diane, Ahnold is quite all right. I miss his weekly phone calls prior to election day where he rooted for Bush.

Eva, I've driven through Oklahoma on my way from NY to
CA. It is very green indeed and Tulsa - I was quite impressed - had an international airport. I guess, I'm just partial to
the coastal towns here in California.

Thank you for the tea and the good wishes.
 
 
Hee, hee, there are still a few who think New Mexico is not a part of the US. Dys always assures them that they won't need a visa if they come to visit. With only two million people in the entire state, it is easy to understand why we tend to be ignored.

A friend from New York City said, with humor, when I told her that we were moving to Albuquerque, "Umm, that is west of the Hudson River, isn't it?" She admits that the middle part of the US map just seems to be one large empty space between New York and California.

Just wait until she comes for a visit and sees the Indian and Mexican men in their tight jeans with those long, thick, black braids hanging down their backs. THUD. It will take lots of gasping to catch her breath after that incredible sight!

Have a Corona and relax for a bit, mi amiga....
 
 
I opened the Yellow Tail Shiraz last night, and on first sip, didn't care for it at all. But the strange part of this wine is the fact that it grows on you! I think the tannin was too strong at first sip, but after about the third, I began to enjoy the fruit flavors that remained in my mouth. It also has a slight liquorice flavor. It's a dark red wine which looks almost purple. For $4.00 bucks a bottle, I can't compalin. I think this wine will go good with bbq and red meats.
 
 
You're most welcome, CJ!

I lived in Ventura, California for six months once, so I am familiar with the charm of Southern California coastal towns. I really liked San Diego...stayed at the Del there for a few days once, and felt like royalty. Still have a bottle of their house champagne, as a matter of fact. Compliments of their manager. (One of their three swimming pools was being repaired, and they felt as though they should offer us something to make up for it...as though the other pools and ten miles of private white sand beach weren't enough! Hahaha) We had a lovely time sailing and swimming, touring the Old Town and enjoying all the sun.

Yes, Tulsa does have an international airport, although it is small. American Airlines has their largest maintenance hub here, so we can get flights practically anywhere. Did you know we're also an international seaport? It's true! Ships come up the Mississippi River, then the Arkansas River right to the port outside Tulsa. Makes it easy for many companies to import and export goods from here. They can bypass the busy port at New Orleans and get in quicker here.
 
 
Diane, I visited Albuquerque, Santa Fee, Taos and some
Pueblo reservations. The cities/towns are certainly different
and beautiful in its architecture, however the rugged terrain
is not something I could get used to.
 
 
 
...A friend from New York City said, with humor, when I told her that we were moving to Albuquerque, "Umm, that is west of the Hudson River, isn't it?" She admits that the middle part of the US map just seems to be one large empty space between New York and California...
 

Shhhh, Diane. Don't tell everyone! Then they'll all move here and we won't have the place to ourselves!
 
 
Oh no!! You're right. Zip my lips!!
 
 
Diane, I wanna go here :

 
 
 
Uh oh. It's started.

Now Francis wants to leave Paris for New Mexico.

Speaking of Paris, my dear, on with the tour! Where shall we go next? Sacre Coeur, perhaps? Or Montmartre?

Let's stroll around, look at the paintings and listen to the street musicians...

 
 
 
As I remember, we were at Musée Rodin. It's by the Invalides. Let's see :

 
 
 
That's where Napoleon's tomb is, right?
 
 
 
I'll pour you one, Lady J  

 
 

Oh, Francis! Thank you kind sir. You are a gentleman beyond compare.  
 
 
Eva, my cultured lady of exquesite knowledge, it is!

Let's take a look inside St Louis church :

 
 
 
[quote="Joe Nation"}

 
If I get really desperate after I move from Sonoma County to Oklahoma, could I talk you into shipping me a good mixed case now and then?
 
You're moving TO Oklahoma?
[/quote]

Yeah...kind of hard to believe anyone would want to leave Sonoma County. Where the wine is plentiful, the beaches are beautiful, the redwoods are amazing, the weather is perfect year round....sigh!

WHAT AM I DOING???? Someone talk me out of this!!
 
 
 
Oh, Francis! Thank you kind sir. You are a gentleman beyond compare.  
 

Lady J, my merits lay far below your incomparable beauty of soul!
 
 
The "chœur des pensionnaires", if I remember correctly.
 
 
Walter, mon bon sire, you remember correctly!
 
 
Wow....Eva! A thread I really, really like! Thank you again for such wonderful hospitality, both from you and your ever charming, enlightening guests who frequent here. Often I shall return and relax amongst the wonderful vintages and equally wonderful company.  

Truly, I am looking forward to my move to Oklahoma. I'll be more in the central part, a suburb of Oklahoma City, but when I want to get away, I'll be passing through Tulsa on my way to 130 acres outside of Grove right on the banks of the Grand Lake of the Cherokees.

I will always have family and friends to come back to in California if I find myself in need of a good Cali fix. New journeys, new adventures await and I am eager to partake.  
 
 
If you love it in Sonoma County so much, Lady J...then, why ARE you moving? Everyone should live where their heart is.

Joe Nation grew up near NYC and always wanted to live there. I think he enjoyed his years in Oklahoma and raised his kids here, but NYC was in his heart. He is much more "at home" there, I think. But I miss him.

The church is gorgeous, Francis. A very fitting place of repose for the self-crowned Emperor.
 
 
 
Eva, my cultured lady of exquesite knowledge, it is!

Let's take a look inside St Louis church :

 
 

Francis....that is absolutely stunning!  
 
 
 
Walter, mon bon sire,
 

C'est beaucoup trop d'honneur pour un simple Second Maitre PDL, seigneur Francis!
 
 
I am following my heart, Eva. The man whom I hope to one day marry lives there. My children are both raised and are gone or going on their own journeys and now it is my time to find my own happiness after many. many. many years of being a single mother.

The hard part it done...now I can enjoy life.  
 
 
